Utah statutes.
53-3-709.   Amendment of compact.

(1) (a)  This compact may be amended from time to time.

(b)  Amendments shall be presented in resolution form to the chairman of the board of compact administrators and may be initiated by one or more party jurisdictions.

(2)  Adoption of an amendment requires endorsement of all party jurisdictions and becomes effective 30 days after the date of the last endorsement.

(3) (a)  Failure of a party jurisdiction to respond to the compact chairman within 120 days after receipt of the proposed amendment constitutes endorsement.

(b)  A report authorized by Section 53-3-104 may not contain any evidence of a suspension that occurred as a result of failure to comply with the requirements of this part.

